Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.315

Grapevine certification and nursery improvement program—Advisory committee.

An advisory committee is established to advise the director in the administration of the grapevine certification and nursery improvement program.

(1) The committee consists of two grapevine nursery dealers; three grape growers, at least two of whom grow wine grapes; one winery representative; a university researcher; and the director.

(2) When appointing this committee, the director shall consider names submitted by the Washington association of wine grape growers and the Washington state grape society.

(3) The terms of the members of the committee shall be staggered and the members shall serve a term of three years and until their successor has been appointed.

[ 2002 c 215 s 2.]